Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2702.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-189.3 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For this section, "special education administrator" means
the director and assistant director of a special education program
for a school district.
B. Beginning August 1, 2026, no school district shall employ a
special education administrator unless the individual:
1. Holds a valid standard teaching certificate issued by the
State Board of Education; and
ENGR. H. B. NO. 2702 Page 1

2. Except as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection D of
this section, obtains an acknowledgment of competency as provided
for in subsection C within one (1) year of being employed as a
special education administrator.
C. 1. The State Board of Education shall issue an
acknowledgement of competency in the area of special education
federal and state laws, regulations, policies, and procedures to a
special education administrator. By January 1, 2026, the State
Board shall develop two (2) tracks for completing a one-time
acknowledgement of competency:
a. a micro-credential track for individuals with five (5)
or less years of experience previously or currently
serving in the role of a special education
administrator, and
b. a standard track for individuals who are not required
to obtain the micro-credential and have six (6) or
more years of experience currently serving in the role
of a special education administrator.
2. The content of the 150-clock hour special education program
shall be the same for the standard track and the micro-credential
track, except the micro-credential track shall require mastery of
competency at or above seventy percent (70%) on coursework and
examinations.

ENGR. H. B. NO. 2702 Page 2

3. Beginning August 1, 2026, an individual must complete either
the standard or micro-credential track within one (1) calendar year
from the date of hire.
4. At the successful completion of either the standard or
micro-credential track, the individual shall receive a certificate
of completion which will be maintained as part of the employee's
record with the local education agency and stored in the Oklahoma
Educator Credentialing System.
D. 1. Except as provided in paragraph 2 of this subsection, a
special education administrator shall successfully complete the
subject area competency examination in either mild-moderate
disabilities, severe-profound disabilities, or comprehensive special
education as prescribed by the State Department of Education.
2. An individual who has a valid Special Education Teaching
Certificate as provided for in Sections 6-122.7, 6-122.8, or 6-122.9
of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes or an individual who has a
master's degree in school administration, special education, or a
related field shall be exempt from the acknowledgement of competency
requirement in subsection C of this section and the subject area
competency examination requirement in paragraph 1 of this
subsection.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
ENGR. H. B. NO. 2702 Page 3

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate














ENGR. H. B. NO. 2702 Page 4